Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-420
Intermediate care facility, defined.

Intermediate care facility means a facility where shelter, food, and nursing care or related services are provided for a period of more than twenty-four consecutive hours to persons residing at such facility who are ill, injured, or disabled and do not require hospital or skilled nursing facility care.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 20.